New Jersey, session 222, A4735.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    (New section) a. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person who for a fee or other compensation performs the services of an amateur sports official shall be considered an independent contractor for purposes of State law. b.    Amateur sports officiating performed for a fee or other compensation shall not be considered employment for any and all purposes including, but not limited to, the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et seq.), P.L.2008, c.17 (C.43:21-39.1 et al.), the "Family Leave Act," P.L.1989, c.261 (C.34:11B-1 et seq.), the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S. 54A:1-1 et seq., P.L.1965, c.173 (C.34:11-4.1 et seq.) or other applicable State tax laws, the workers compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq., the "New Jersey State Wage and Hour Law," P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a et seq.), the "New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act," P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), or P.L.2018, c.10 (C.34:11D-1 et seq.). c.     As used in this section, amateur sports official means a person who enforces the rules, manages the game, and ensures the safety of participants in amateur athletic events and may include responsibility for making calls, keeping time, tracking scores, and maintaining fair play and good sportsmanship.  Amateur sports official includes a referee or umpire of an amateur athletic event. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall also apply retroactively to any audit or administrative law or court proceeding pending as of the date of the enactment of this act.  This act shall also apply to any audit or administrative law or court proceeding instituted after the effective date hereof seeking to classify amateur sports official services for any period prior to the effective date of this act as employment pursuant to any and all New Jersey laws, including, but not limited to the "unemployment compensation law," R.S.43:21-1 et seq., the "Temporary Disability Benefits Law," P.L.1948, c.110 (C.43:21-25 et seq.), P.L.2008, c.17 (C.43:21-39.1 et al.), the "Family Leave Act," P.L.1989, c.261 (C.34:11B-1 et seq.), the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S. 54A:1-1 et seq., P.L.1965, c.173 (C.34:11-4.1 et seq.) or other applicable State tax laws, the workers compensation law, R.S.34:15-1 et seq., or the "New Jersey State Wage and Hour Law," P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a et seq.), the "New Jersey Prevailing Wage Act," P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.), or P.L.2018, c.10 (C.34:11D-1 et seq.).